indra/newview/app_settings/dictionaries/da_dk.aff
FLAG num
#Substantiv, konsonantfordobling, intetkøn, -Ø i flertal
SFX 254 Y 19
SFX 254 0 b/53,252,10 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 254 0 d/53,252,10 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 254 0 f/53,252,10 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 254 0 c/53,252,10 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 254 0 p/53,252,10 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 254 0 g/53,252,10 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 254 0 h/53,252,10 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 254 0 j/53,252,10 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 254 0 l/53,252,10 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 254 0 n/53,252,10 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 254 0 q/53,252,10 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 254 0 r/53,252,10 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 254 0 k/53,252,10 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 254 0 s/53,252,10 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 254 0 t/53,252,10 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 254 0 v/53,252,10 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 254 0 w/53,252,10 w	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 254 0 x/53,252,10 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 254 0 z/53,252,10 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
#Substantiv, konsonantfordobling, fælleskøn, -Ø i flertal
SFX 267 Y 19
SFX 267 0 b/53,252,7 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 d/53,252,7 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 f/53,252,7 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 c/53,252,7 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 p/53,252,7 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 g/53,252,7 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 h/53,252,7 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 j/53,252,7 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 l/53,252,7 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 n/53,252,7 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 q/53,252,7 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 r/53,252,7 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 k/53,252,7 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 s/53,252,7 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 t/53,252,7 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 v/53,252,7 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 w/53,252,7 w	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 x/53,252,7 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 267 0 z/53,252,7 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
#Adjektiv, svagt bøjet, intetkøn
SFX 366 Y 1
SFX 366 0 t/70,944 [^t]	+BESTEMT_ENTAL
#Apostrof, fælleskøn
SFX 401 Y 1
SFX 401 0 '/53,7,73,70 .
#Apostrof, intetkøn
SFX 402 Y 1
SFX 402 0 '/53,10,73,70 .
#Apostrof NeedAffix

#Sammensætning, fugeelement -
SFX 466 Y 2
SFX 466 0 -/942,945 .
SFX 466 0 -/943,945 .
