indra/newview/app_settings/dictionaries/da_dk.dic
vidnefast/976,466
vidløs/70,962,366,466
vi/70,10,73,976,466
V-formet/70,1062,466
veterinærvidenskabelig/207,70,366,976,466
veterinærmedicinsk/976,466
vesttysk/976,466
vestside/70,73,7,976,466
vestromersk/976,466
vestre/976,466
vestpå/466
vestover/466
vestjysk/976,466
vestindisk/917,976,466
vestgående/916,976,466
vestgoter/20,7,70,976,466
vestfront/70,73,7,976,466
vesterud/466
vesteuropæisk/917,976,466
vesterlandsk/976,466
vesten/466
vestende/70,73,7,976,466
vesterbrosk/976,466
vestdansk/976,466
vestberlinsk/976,466
vesper/193,70,976,466
veråb/70,252,10,976,466
versionere/6,143,148,466
versificere/6,143,148,466
versere/6,143,148,466
versal/70,73,7,976,466
verdens-/466
verbal/70,962,366,466
ventrikel/70,976,466
ventil/70,73,7,976,466
velbehagelig/207,70,366,976
vandløs/70,962,366
vandingsanlæg/70,254,976
v/402
V/402
uvejsom/1025,366,976
utilstedelig/207,70,366,976
usmidig/207,70,366,976
uretfærdig/207,70,366,976
uppercut/70,267,976
uopsigelig/207,70,366,976
undtagelsesfri/70,962,366
umeddelsom/1025,366,976
ukontroversiel/1106,70,366
uhjælpsom/1025,366,976
ug/402
uforsigtig/207,70,366,976
ufarlig/207,70,366,976
udvikler/20,7,70,976,466
udslip/70,254,976
udførselsforbud/70,254,976
udadlelig/207,70,366,976
ubekvem/1106,70,366
U/402
u/402
tåled/70,254,976
tålelig/207,70,366,976
tyttebær/70,267,976
tvetydig/207,70,366,976
tv/402
tut/70,254,976
tryg/1106,70,366
trusseindlæg/70,254,976
tredje/70,466
traktatlig/207,70,366,976
traktatbrud/70,254,976
tjæreholdig/207,70,366,976
titel/70,976,466
tip/70,254,976
tilbageblik/70,254,976
tidlig/207,70,366,976
telenet/70,254,976
tekst-tv/402
tandstik/70,254,976
talblind/70,962,366
t/402
T/402
særtræk/70,254,976
sælsom/1025,366,976
syntaks/70,73,7,976,466
sydvestlig/207,70,366,976
svibelglas/70,254,976
sundhedsskadelig/207,70,366,976
støjfri/70,962,366
stuverum/70,254,976
stripper/20,7,70,976,466
strafskyldig/207,70,366,976
storkenæb/70,267,976
stjerneskud/70,254,976
stjerneanis/70,267,976
stikkelsbær/70,267,976,941,947
stenrig/70,962,366
stem/70,254,976,941,947
spæd/70,962,366
spyd/70,254,976,941,947
spot/70,267,976
spillegal/70,962,366
specialtilbud/70,254,976
SOS/402
sommer/70,976,466
solitær/70,962,366
snit/70,254,976,941,947
småskør/70,962,366
smut/70,254,976,941,947
smagfuld/70,962,366
slæt/70,267,976
slum/70,267,976
slagtilbud/70,254,976
skønlitterær/70,962,366
skud/70,254,976
skrupskør/70,962,366
skorstensaftræk/70,254,976
skole-tv/402
skidefuld/70,962,366
sjak/70,254,976,941,947
singrøn/70,267,976
simultan/70,962,366
selvretfærdig/207,70,366,976
sekstrin/70,254,976
satellit-tv/402
sandhedskærlig/207,70,366,976
sammenklap/70,254,976
salig/207,70,366,976
S/402
s/402
rørnet/70,254,976
rødnæb/70,267,976
ræverød/70,962,366
rodnet/70,254,976
risikoløs/70,962,366
ressourcemæssig/207,70,366,976
rentetilskud/70,254,976
reklame-TV/402
regnsæt/70,254,976
regntung/70,962,366
regional-tv/402
rawlplug/70,267,976
rational/70,962,366
rag/70,267,976
radialdæk/70,254,976
r/402
q/402
påskebryg/70,267,976
python/70,73,7,976,466
put/70,254,976
purung/70,962,366
provestlig/207,70,366,976
promenadedæk/70,254,976
principløs/70,962,366
pointeløs/70,962,366
plot/70,254,976
pivot/70,73,7,976,466
pinefuld/70,962,366
pilot/70,73,7,976,466
persilledrys/70,254,976
penge/70,976,466
passus/70,267,976
passiv/70,962,366
parabol/70,73,7,976,466
p/402
P/402
overspil/70,254,976
overmenneskelig/207,70,366,976
overbud/70,254,976
organisatorisk/917,976,466
oral/70,962,366
optryk/70,254,976
oparbejdningsanlæg/70,254,976
omtrentlig/207,70,366,976
offerlam/70,254,976
O/402
o/402
nådig/207,70,366,976
nykonservativ/70,962,366
nybrud/70,254,976
nem/1106,70,366
nedsivningsanlæg/70,254,976
nasal/70,962,366
n/402
N/402
målmandsspil/70,254,976
mærke/70,10,73,976,466
mængdemæssig/207,70,366,976
myg/70,267,976,941,947
mundglas/70,254,976
mosekonebryg/70,267,976
morgensøvnig/207,70,366,976
modsat/207,70,366,976
modhug/70,254,976
mode/70,73,7,976,466
mini-tv/402
miljøskadelig/207,70,366,976
mikrochip/70,267,976
messingsøm/70,254,976
meningsmæssig/207,70,366,976
megaton/70,254,976
medansvarlig/207,70,366,976
master/20,7,70,976,466
markled/70,254,976
malign/70,962,366
malariamyg/70,267,976
M/402
m/402
læsesvag/70,962,366
lystanlæg/70,254,976
lydtom/1106,70,366
lp/401
lovlydig/207,70,366,976
lotus/70,267,976,941,947
lokal-tv/402
lokalnet/70,254,976
lokale/70,10,73,976,466
ligesådan/1106,70,366
leptosom/70,962,366
ledningsanlæg/70,254,976
lapsus/70,267,976
langskud/70,254,976
l/402
køleanlæg/70,254,976
kær/70,962,366
kvalkved/70,267,976
kul/70,254,976
kreditværdig/207,70,366,976
krak/70,254,976
kopi/70,73,7,976,466
koordinator/70,73,7,976,466
konsonant/70,73,7,976,466
komposteringsanlæg/70,254,976
komplementær/70,962,366
kokos/70,267,976,941,947
kluk/70,254,976,941,947
klem/70,254,976,941,947
kirsebærrød/70,962,366
kirsebær/70,267,976,941,947
kasinospil/70,254,976
kammerspil/70,254,976
kabel-tv/402
k/402
K/402
jordskred/70,254,976
jordbær/70,267,976,941,947
jordbrun/70,962,366
jomfru/70,73,7,976,466
j/402
islæt/70,267,976
inhabil/70,962,366
indtræk/70,254,976
indhak/70,254,976
idémæssig/207,70,366,976
i/402
I/402
håndtryk/70,254,976
høslæt/70,267,976
høgenæb/70,254,976
hyperaktiv/70,962,366
hovedvandsæg/70,254,976
hjertelig/207,70,366,976
hiphop/70,254,976,941,947
hibiscus/70,267,976
henkogningsglas/70,254,976
hellig/207,70,366,976,466
hdtv/402
handelsoverskud/70,254,976
halvskør/70,962,366
h/402
gålæg/70,254,976
gul/70,962,366,466
gudelig/207,70,366,976
græsk/193,70,976,466
granitbrud/70,254,976
glansløs/70,962,366
gladiolus/70,267,976
gitter/70,976,466
gimmerlam/70,254,976
gestus/70,267,976
gangspil/70,254,976
galnebær/70,267,976
galmyg/70,267,976
G/402
g/402
førtidig/207,70,366,976
fyringsanlæg/70,254,976
fruebær/70,267,976
from/1106,70,366
frisbee/401
fredsbrud/70,254,976
forsætlig/207,70,366,976
forsyningsanlæg/70,254,976
forrum/70,254,976
formular/70,73,7,976,466
form/70,73,7,976,466
fordringsløs/70,962,366
forbindelsesled/70,254,976
flotationsanlæg/70,254,976
fjernvarmenet/70,254,976
fisefornem/1106,70,366
fedterøvstillæg/70,254,976
farve-tv/402
fartgal/70,962,366
f/402
eukalyptus/70,267,976
etbær/70,267,976
ep/401
enlig/207,70,366,976
el-anlæg/70,254,976
Værløse/55,466
IT/466
eftertrykkelig/207,70,366,976
edb-anlæg/70,254,976
e/402
dyp/70,254,976,941,947
dubiøs/70,962,366
drinksglas/70,254,976
djævelsbid/70,267,976
dip/70,267,976
dik/70,254,976,941,947
digitalis/70,267,976,940,947
digital/70,962,366,466
diagram/70,9,976,466
del/20,7,70,976,466
deform/70,962,366
dagplejehjem/70,254,976
d/402
D/402
cyklamen/70,267,976
cyclamen/70,267,976
cirkeludsnit/70,254,976
chip/70,267,976
CDROM/401
C/402
c/402
børne-tv/402
børnetal/70,254,976
buksbom/70,267,976
bud/70,254,976,941,947
brødløs/70,962,366
brun/70,962,366,466
brud/70,254,976
bolle-å/402
blåbær/70,267,976
blus/70,254,976,940,947
blokeringsfri/70,962,366
bit/70,267,976,941,947
bip/70,254,976,941,947
bibel/70,976,466
bh/401
betalings-tv/402
betalingsdygtig/207,70,366,976
belæg/70,254,976
bagdæk/70,254,976
b/402
B/402
autoritær/70,962,366,941,947
antenneanlæg/70,254,976
antagelig/207,70,366,976
anis/70,267,976
ananaskirsebær/70,254,976
al/1106,70,366
akantus/70,267,976
aftryk/70,254,976
Basic/190,976,466
proxy/70,73,7,976,466
hyperlink/70,976,466
Mozilla/55,466
Netscape/55,466
Firefox/55,466
CTRL/466
Macintosh/55,466
skabelon/401,941,947
CMYK/466
dias/70,267,976,941,947
PHP/466
JPG/466
cd/401,466
Writer/190,976,466
Writer/55,466
backup/70,976,466
OpenDocument/55,466
informationsflow/70,976,466
CRM/466
BA/466
XML/466
txt/466
it/466
affaldsforbrændingsanlæg/70,254,976
ABC/401
a/402
vildskud/70,254,976
vilkårlig/207,70,366,976
vintergrøn/70,267,976
værdiløs/70,962,366
w/402
wc/402
X/402
x/402
y/402
yankee/401
yen/70,267,976
ymerdrys/70,254,976
yuan/70,267,976
z/402
æ/402
ø/402
å/402
åndsfattig/207,70,366,976
århusianer/20,7,70,976,466
Kurt/55,466
DVD/401,466
el/466
layout/70,10,73,976,466
hhx/466
dtp/466
cvr/466
OpenOffice.org/55,466
Bosnien/55,466
pc/401,,947
dvd/401,466
grundled/70,267,976
source/193,70,976,466
